Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.120

Support or maintenance payments—To whom paid.

(1) The court shall order support payments, including maintenance if child support is ordered, to be made to the Washington state support registry, or the person entitled to receive the payments under an order approved by the court as provided in RCW 26.23.050.

(2) Maintenance payments, when ordered in an action where there is no dependent child, may be ordered to be paid to the person entitled to receive the payments, or the clerk of the court as trustee for remittance to the persons entitled to receive the payments.

(3) If support or maintenance payments are made to the clerk of court, the clerk:

(a) Shall maintain records listing the amount of payments, the date when payments are required to be made, and the names and addresses of the parties affected by the order;

(b) May by local court rule accept only certified funds or cash as payment; and

(c) Shall accept only certified funds or cash for five years in all cases after one check has been returned for nonsufficient funds or account closure.

(4) The parties affected by the order shall inform the registry through which the payments are ordered to be paid of any change of address or of other conditions that may affect the administration of the order.

[ 2008 c 6 s 1015; 1994 c 230 s 2; 1989 c 360 s 11. Prior: 1987 c 435 s 15; 1987 c 363 s 5; 1983 1st ex.s. c 45 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 157 s 12.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Effective date—1987 c 435: See RCW 26.23.900.